Utah statutes.
76-10-1222.   Distribution of pornographic film -- Penalties for violations.
(1) Any person who knowingly or by criminal negligence distributes for
exhibition within this state a film which is pornographic as that term is
defined in the Utah criminal code shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor and
shall, for each separate offense, be fined not less than $1,000 and
imprisoned, without suspension of sentence in any way, for a term of not less
than 60 days.
(2)  Any person convicted of a violation of this section who has been
convicted before of a violation of this section, shall be guilty of a felony
of the third degree and shall, for each separate offense, be fined not less
than $5,000 and imprisoned, without suspension of sentence in any way, for a
term of not less than six months.
(3)  Each copy of a pornographic film distributed for exhibition within this
state in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.
